Missouri, session 2026, HB2680.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 170.029, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 170.029, to read as follows:
170.029. 1. The state board of education shall develop a statewide plan for career and
technical education (CTE) that ensures sustainability, viability, and relevance by matching
workforce needs with appropriate educational resources.
2. The state board of education, in consultation with the career and technical
education advisory council as established in section 178.550, shall establish minimum
requirements for a CTE certificate that a student can earn in addition to the student's high
school graduation diploma. Students entering high school in school year 2017-18 and
thereafter shall be eligible to earn a CTE certificate.
3. The statewide plan shall establish CTE requirements intended to provide students
with the necessary technical employability skills to be prepared for an entry-level career in a
technical field or additional training in a technical field. The provisions of this section shall
not be considered a means for tracking students in order to impel students to particular
vocational, career, or college paths. The state board of education shall work with local school
districts to ensure that tracking does not occur. For purposes of this section, "tracking" means
separating pupils by academic ability into groups for all subjects or certain classes and
curriculum.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2680 2
4. Each local school district shall determine the curriculum, programs of study, and
course offerings based on the needs and interests of the students in the district and meeting the
requirements of the statewide plan. As required by Missouri's state plan for career education
and the Missouri school improvement program, the state board of education shall work in
cooperation with individual school districts to stipulate the minimum number of CTE
offerings. Each local school district shall strive to offer programs of study that are
economically feasible for students in the district. In establishing CTE offerings, the district
may rely on standards, technical coursework, and skills assessments developed for industry-
recognized certificates or credentials.
5. To enable school districts to offer CTE programs of study that are current with
business and industry standards, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
convene work groups from each program area to develop and recommend rigorous and
relevant performance standards or course competencies for each program of study. The work
groups shall include, but not be limited to, educators providing instruction in each CTE
program area, advisors from each CTE program area from the department of elementary and
secondary education, the department of higher education and workforce development,
business and industry, and institutions of higher education. The department of elementary
and secondary education shall develop written model curriculum frameworks relating to CTE
program areas that may be used by school districts. The requirements of section 160.514
shall not apply to this section.
6. No later than January 1, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop a process for recognition of a school district's career and technical
education program that offers a career and technical education certificate.
7. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop
performance standards, course competencies, and a written model curriculum
framework related to insurance licensing and certification for all career and technical
education programs. The department shall consult with the department of higher
education and workforce development and the department of commerce and insurance
when developing such performance standards, course competencies, and written model
curriculum framework. The department shall make such model curriculum framework
available for use in the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years. All career
and technical education programs shall adopt the department's model curriculum
framework or a substantially similar curriculum for the 2028-29 school year and all
subsequent school years.
8. The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in

HB 2680 3
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.
✔